Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 4. Broker-Dealers, Agents, Investment Advisers, Investment Adviser Representatives, and Federal Covered Investment Advisers

§ 5401.
Broker-dealer registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for a person to transact business in this State as a broker-dealer unless the person is registered under this chapter as a broker-dealer or is exempt from registration as a broker-dealer under subsection (b) or (d) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

a broker-dealer without a place of business in this State if its only transactions effected in this State are with:

the issuer of the securities involved in the transactions;

a broker-dealer registered as a broker-dealer under this chapter or not required to be registered as a broker-dealer under this chapter;

an institutional investor;

a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000.00 acting for the account of others pursuant to discretionary authority in a signed record;

a bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is not in this State, and the person is registered as a broker-dealer under

15 U.S.C. § 78a

et seq. or not required to be registered under

15 U.S.C. § 78a

et seq. and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the customer maintains a principal place of residence;

a bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is in this State but was not present in this State when the customer relationship was established, if:

the broker-dealer is registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq. or not required to be registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq. and is registered under the securities laws of the state in which the customer relationship was established and where the customer had maintained a principal place of residence; and

within 45 days after the customer’s first transaction in this State, the person files an application for registration as a broker-dealer in this State and a further transaction is not effected more than 75 days after the date on which the application is filed, or, if earlier, the date on which the Commissioner notifies the person that the Commissioner has denied the application for registration or has stayed the pendency of the application for good cause;

not more than three customers in this State during the previous 12 months, in addition to those customers specified in subdivisions (A) through (F) and under subdivision (H) of this subdivision, if the broker-dealer is registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq. or not required to be registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq. and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the broker-dealer has its principal place of business; and

any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a person that deals solely in U.S. government securities and is supervised as a dealer in government securities by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Office of Thrift Supervision; and

any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

It is unlawful for a broker-dealer, or for an issuer engaged in offering, offering to purchase, purchasing, or selling securities in this State, directly or indirectly, to employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to securities transactions in this State if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-dealer, an issuer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser by an order of the Commissioner under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization. A broker-dealer or issuer does not violate this subsection if the broker-dealer or issuer did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from a broker-dealer or issuer and for good cause, an order under this chapter may modify or waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the broker-dealer.

A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may permit:

a broker-dealer that is registered in Canada or other foreign jurisdiction and that does not have a place of business in this State to effect transactions in securities with or for, or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of any securities by:

an individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is temporarily present in this State and with whom the broker-dealer had a bona fide customer relationship before the individual entered the United States;

an individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is present in this State and whose transactions are in a self-directed tax advantaged retirement plan of which the individual is the holder or contributor in that foreign jurisdiction; or

an individual who is present in this State, with whom the broker-dealer customer relationship arose while the individual was temporarily or permanently resident in Canada or the other foreign jurisdiction; and

an agent who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under this subsection to effect transactions in securities or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of securities in this State as permitted for a broker-dealer described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006; amended

2007, No. 49

, § 26.

§ 5402.
Agent registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for an individual to transact business in this State as an agent unless the individual is registered under this chapter as an agent or is exempt from registration as an agent under subsection (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

an individual who represents a broker-dealer in effecting transactions in this State limited to those described in

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(a)(2);

an individual who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under subsection 5401(b) or (d) of this chapter;

an individual who represents an issuer with respect to an offer or sale of the issuer’s own securities or those of the issuer’s parent or any of the issuer’s subsidiaries, and who is not compensated in connection with the individual’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

an individual who represents an issuer and who effects transactions in the issuer’s securities exempted by section 5202 of this chapter, other than subdivisions 5202(11) and (14);

an individual who represents an issuer that effects transactions solely in federal covered securities of the issuer, but an individual who effects transactions in a federal covered security under

15 U.S.C. § 77r

(b)(3) or (4)(D) is not exempt if the individual is compensated in connection with the agent’s participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities;

an individual who represents a broker-dealer registered in this State under subsection 5401(a) of this chapter or exempt from registration under subsection 5401(b) of this chapter in the offer and sale of securities for an account of a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000.00 acting for the account of others pursuant to discretionary authority in a signed record;

an individual who represents an issuer in connection with the purchase of the issuer’s own securities;

an individual who represents an issuer and who restricts participation to performing clerical or ministerial acts; or

any other individual exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registration of an agent is effective only while the agent is employed by or associated with a broker-dealer registered under this chapter or an issuer that is offering, selling, or purchasing its securities in this State.

It is unlawful for a broker-dealer, or an issuer engaged in offering, selling, or purchasing securities in this State, to employ or associate with an agent who transacts business in this State on behalf of broker-dealers or issuers unless the agent is registered under subsection (a) of this section or exempt from registration under subsection (b) of this section.

An individual may not act as an agent for more than one broker-dealer or one issuer at a time, unless the broker-dealer or the issuer for which the agent acts is affiliated by direct or indirect common control or is authorized by rule or order under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5403.
Investment adviser registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for a person to transact business in this State as an investment adviser unless the person is registered under this chapter as an investment adviser or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser under subsection (b) of this section.

The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

a person without a place of business in this State that is registered under the securities act of the state in which the person has its principal place of business if its only clients in this State are:

federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this chapter, or broker-dealers registered under this chapter;

institutional investors;

bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this State if the investment adviser is registered under the securities act of the state in which the clients maintain principal places of residence; or

any other client exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a person without a place of business in this State if the person has had, during the preceding 12 months, not more than five clients that are resident in this State in addition to those specified under subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

any other person exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

It is unlawful for an investment adviser, directly or indirectly, to employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to investment advice in this State if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or broker-dealer by an order under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the investment adviser did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the suspension, revocation, or bar. Upon request from the investment adviser and for good cause, the Commissioner, by order, may waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection to the investment adviser.

It is unlawful for an investment adviser to employ or associate with an individual required to be registered under this chapter as an investment adviser representative who transacts business in this State on behalf of the investment adviser unless the individual is registered under subsection 5404(a) of this chapter or is exempt from registration under subsection 5404(b).

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5404.
Investment adviser representative registration requirement and exemptions.

It is unlawful for an individual to transact business in this State as an investment adviser representative unless the individual is registered under this chapter as an investment adviser representative or is exempt from registration as an investment adviser representative under subsection (b) of this section.

The following individuals are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (a) of this section:

an individual who is employed by or associated with an investment adviser that is exempt from registration under subsection 5403(b) of this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that is excluded from the notice filing requirements of section 5405 of this chapter; and

any other individual exempted by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registration of an investment adviser representative is not effective while the investment adviser representative is not employed by or associated with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has made or is required to make a notice filing under section 5405 of this chapter.

An individual may transact business as an investment adviser representative for more than one investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser unless a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter prohibits or limits an individual from acting as an investment adviser representative for more than one investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser.

It is unlawful for an individual acting as an investment adviser representative, directly or indirectly, to conduct business in this State on behalf of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser if the registration of the individual as an investment adviser representative is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser by an order under this chapter, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization. Upon request from a federal covered investment adviser and for good cause, the Commissioner, by order issued, may waive, in whole or in part, the application of the requirements of this subsection to the federal covered investment adviser.

An investment adviser registered under this chapter, a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under section 5405 of this chapter, or a broker-dealer registered under this chapter is not required to employ or associate with an individual as an investment adviser representative if the only compensation paid to the individual for a referral of investment advisory clients is paid to an investment adviser registered under this chapter, a federal covered investment adviser who has filed a notice under section 5405, or a broker-dealer registered under this chapter with which the individual is employed or associated as an investment adviser representative.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5405.
Federal covered investment adviser notice filing requirement.

Except with respect to a federal covered investment adviser described in subsection (b) of this section, it is unlawful for a federal covered investment adviser to transact business in this State as a federal covered investment adviser unless the federal covered investment adviser complies with subsection (c) of this section.

The following federal covered investment advisers are not required to comply with subsection (c) of this section:

a federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this State if its only clients in this State are:

federal covered investment advisers, investment advisers registered under this chapter, and broker-dealers registered under this chapter;

institutional investors;

bona fide preexisting clients whose principal places of residence are not in this State; or

other clients specified by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter;

a federal covered investment adviser without a place of business in this State if the person has had, during the preceding 12 months, not more than five clients that are resident in this State in addition to those specified under subdivision (1) of this subsection; and

any other person excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

A person acting as a federal covered investment adviser, not excluded under subsection (b) of this section, shall file a notice, a consent to service of process complying with section 5611 of this chapter, and such records as have been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-1 et seq. required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter and pay the fees specified in subsection 5410(e) of this chapter.

The notice under subsection (c) of this section becomes effective upon its filing.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5406.
Registration by broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser representative.

A person shall register as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative by filing an application and a consent to service of process complying with section 5611 of this chapter, and paying the fee specified in section 5410 of this chapter and any reasonable fees charged by the designee of the Commissioner for processing the filing. The application must contain:

the information or record required for the filing of a uniform application; and

upon request by the Commissioner, any other financial or other information or record that the Commissioner determines is appropriate.

If the information or record contained in an application filed under subsection (a) of this section is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

If an order is not in effect and a proceeding is not pending under section 5412 of this chapter or if the applicant and the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee have not mutually agreed to delay effectiveness for a specified period of time, registration becomes effective at noon on the 45th day after a completed application is filed, unless registration is denied. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may set an earlier effective date or may defer the effective date until noon on the 45th day after the filing of any amendment completing the application.

A registration is effective until midnight on December 31 of the year for which the application for registration is filed. Unless an order is in effect under section 5412 of this chapter, a registration may be automatically renewed each year by filing such records as are required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, by paying the fee specified in section 5410 of this chapter, and by paying costs charged by the designee of the Commissioner for processing the filings.

A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may impose such other conditions not inconsistent with the National Securities Markets Improvement Act of 1996. An order issued under this chapter may waive, in whole or in part, specific requirements in connection with registration as are in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5407.
Succession and change in registration of broker-dealer or investment adviser.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of another broker-dealer or investment adviser or a notice filing of a federal covered investment adviser, and a federal covered investment adviser may succeed to the current registration of an investment adviser or notice filing of another federal covered investment adviser, by filing as a successor an application for registration pursuant to section 5401 or 5403 of this chapter or a notice pursuant to section 5405 of this chapter for the unexpired portion of the current registration or notice filing.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its form of organization or state of incorporation or organization may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration if the change does not involve a material change in its financial condition or management. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant in its filing. The new organization is a successor to the original registrant for the purposes of this chapter. If there is a material change in financial condition or management, the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall file a new application for registration. A predecessor registered under this chapter shall stop conducting its securities business other than winding down transactions and shall file for withdrawal of broker-dealer or investment adviser registration within 45 days after filing its amendment to effect succession.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser that changes its name may continue its registration by filing an amendment to its registration. The amendment becomes effective when filed or on a date designated by the registrant.

A change of control of a broker-dealer or investment adviser may be made in accordance with a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2006.

§ 5408.
Termination of employment or association of agent and investment adviser representative and transfer of employment or association.

If an agent registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer or issuer, or if an investment adviser representative registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser, or if either registrant terminates activities that require registration as an agent or investment adviser representative, the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser shall promptly file a notice of termination. If the registrant learns that the broker-dealer, issuer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser has not filed the notice, the registrant may do so.

If an agent registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with a broker-dealer registered under this chapter and begins employment by or association with another broker-dealer registered under this chapter; or if an investment adviser representative registered under this chapter terminates employment by or association with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under section 5405 of this title and begins employment by or association with another investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered investment adviser that has filed a notice under section 5405 of this title; then upon the filing by or on behalf of the registrant, within 30 days after the termination, of an application for registration that complies with the requirement of subsection 5406(a) of this title and payment of the filing fee required under section 5410 of this title, the registration of the agent or investment adviser representative is:

immediately effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s Central Registration Depository record or successor record or the investment adviser representative’s Central Registration Depository record or successor record does not contain a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the previous 12 months; or

temporarily effective as of the date of the completed filing, if the agent’s Central Registration Depository record or successor record or the investment adviser representative’s Central Registration Depository record or successor record contains a new or amended disciplinary disclosure within the preceding 12 months.

The Commissioner may withdraw a temporary registration if there are or were grounds for discipline as specified in section 5412 of this title and the Commissioner does so within 30 days after the filing of the application. If the Commissioner does not withdraw the temporary registration within the 30-day period, registration becomes automatically effective on the 31st day after filing.

The Commissioner may prevent the effectiveness of a transfer of an agent or investment adviser representative under subdivision (b)(1) or (2) of this section based on the public interest and the protection of investors.

If the Commissioner determines that a registrant or applicant for registration is no longer in existence or has ceased to act as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or is the subject of an adjudication of incapacity or is subject to the control of a committee, conservator, or guardian, or cannot reasonably be located, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that the registration be canceled or terminated or the application denied. The Commissioner may reinstate a canceled or terminated registration, with or without hearing, and may make the registration retroactive.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006; amended

2007, No. 49

, § 22.

§ 5409.
Withdrawal of registration of broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment representative.

Withdrawal of registration by a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes effective 60 days after the filing of the application to withdraw or within any shorter period as provided by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter unless a revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is filed. If a proceeding is pending, withdrawal becomes effective when and upon such conditions as required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. The Commissioner may institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under section 5412 of this chapter within one year after the withdrawal became effective automatically and issue a revocation or suspension order as of the last date on which registration was effective if a proceeding is not pending.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 5410.
Filing fees.

A person shall pay a fee of $300.00 when initially filing an application for registration as a broker-dealer and a fee of $300.00 when filing a renewal of registration as a broker-dealer. A separate application in writing for branch office registration or renewal, accompanied by a filing fee of $120.00 per branch office, shall be filed in the Office of the Commissioner in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe by any broker-dealer who transacts business in this State from any place of business located within this State. The fee is nonrefundable.

The fee for an individual is $120.00 when filing an application for registration as an agent, $120.00 when filing a renewal of registration as an agent, and $120.00 when filing for a change of registration as an agent. The fee is nonrefundable.

A person shall pay a fee of $300.00 when filing an application for registration as an investment adviser and a fee of $300.00 when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser. A separate application in writing for branch office registration or renewal, accompanied by a filing fee of $120.00 per branch office, shall be filed in the Office of the Commissioner in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe by any investment adviser who transacts business in this State from any place of business located within the State. The fee is nonrefundable.

The fee for an individual is $80.00 when filing an application for registration as an investment adviser representative, $80.00 when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser representative, and $80.00 when filing a change of registration as an investment adviser representative. The fee is nonrefundable.

A federal covered investment adviser required to file a notice under section 5405 of this title shall pay an initial fee of $300.00 and an annual notice fee of $300.00. A notice filing may be terminated by filing notice of such termination with the Commissioner. The fee is nonrefundable.

A person required to pay a filing or notice fee under this section may transmit the fee through or to a designee as a rule or order provides under this chapter.

The Commissioner may, as an alternative means of registering branch offices as set forth in subsections (a) and (c) of this section, register branch offices by means of or through the facilities of a national organization that facilitates branch office registration on a nationwide basis, and comply with the terms of any agreement or contract entered into with such national organization. The initial and annual renewal filing fees per branch office specified in subsections (a) and (c) of this section shall apply to any such centralized filing and shall be paid at the time of filing. In the event of conflict between this provision and other pertinent provisions of this chapter, the Commissioner may elect that this provision prevail.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Commissioner may, upon written request, waive or issue a refund of fees due or paid pursuant to this chapter to military personnel who comply with all the following:

the applicant has been called or recalled to active duty status or to a status similar to active duty;

the applicant’s active duty status is expected to remain unchanged for six months or more during the calendar year for which the refund is requested; and

the active duty status will prevent the applicant from acting as an agent, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser during the relevant time period.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006; amended

2005, No. 72

, § 3d, eff. July 1, 2006;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2013, No. 29

, § 19, eff. May 13, 2013;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 33a;

2019, No. 70

, § 4;

2019, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2021, No. 25

, § 18, eff. May 12, 2021.

§ 5411.
Postregistration requirements.

Subject to

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(h) or

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-22, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this chapter and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this chapter.

Subject to

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(h) or

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-22, a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall file such financial reports as are required by a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

Subject to

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(h) or

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-22:

a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter;

broker-dealer records required to be maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under

15 U.S.C. § 78q

(a) if they are readily accessible to the Commissioner; and

investment adviser records required to be maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter are subject to such reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the Commissioner, within or without this State, as the Commissioner considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The Commissioner may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the Commissioner reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The Commissioner may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection.

Subject to

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(h) or

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-22, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount to be established by rule or order. The Commissioner may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this chapter whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this chapter whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by rule or order under this chapter. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in subdivision 5509(j)(2) of this chapter.

Subject to

15 U.S.C. § 78o

(h) or

15 U.S.C. § 80b

-22, an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer, and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client.

With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that information or other record be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this State as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients.

A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require an individual registered under section 5402 or 5404 of this chapter to participate in a continuing education program approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and administered by a self-regulatory organization or, in the absence of such a program, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require continuing education for an individual registered under section 5404.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 11

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2006.